Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Article 1. Children’s Proceedings.
Sec. 47.10.141.
Runaway and missing minors.

Upon receiving a written, telephonic, or other request to locate a minor evading the minor’s legal custodian or to locate a minor otherwise missing, a law enforcement agency shall make reasonable efforts to locate the minor and shall immediately complete a missing person’s report containing information necessary for the identification of the minor. As soon as practicable, but not later than 24 hours after completing the report, the agency shall transmit the report for entry into the Alaska Public Safety Information Network and the National Crime Information Center computer system. The report shall also be submitted to the missing persons information clearinghouse under AS

18.65.620

. As soon as practicable, but not later than 24 hours after the agency learns that the minor has been located, it shall request that the Department of Public Safety and the Federal Bureau of Investigation remove the information from the computer systems.

A peace officer shall take into protective custody a minor described in (a) of this section if the minor is not otherwise subject to arrest or detention. Unless (c) of this section applies, when a peace officer takes a minor into protective custody under this subsection,

the peace officer shall

return the minor to the minor’s parent or guardian at the parent’s or guardian’s residence if the residence is in the same community where the minor was found and if the minor’s parent or guardian consents to the return, except that the officer may not use this option if the officer has reasonable cause to believe that the minor has experienced physical or sexual abuse in the parent’s or guardian’s household;

take the minor to a nearby location agreed to by the minor’s parent or guardian if the parent or guardian does not consent to return of the minor under (A) of this paragraph and the officer does not have reasonable cause to believe that the minor has experienced physical or sexual abuse in the parent’s or guardian’s household; or

if disposition of the minor is not made under (A) or (B) of this paragraph, take the minor to

an office specified by the Department of Health and Social Services;

a program for runaway minors licensed by the department under AS

47.10.310

;

a shelter for runaways that has a permit from the department under AS 47.32 that agrees to shelter the minor;

a facility or contract agency of the department; or

another suitable location and promptly notify the department if an office specified by the department, a licensed program for runaway minors, a shelter for runaways that will accept the minor, or a facility or contract agency of the department does not exist in the community;

if the peace officer plans to take the minor to an office, program, shelter, or facility under (1)(C) of this subsection, the peace officer shall give the highest priority to taking the minor to an office, program, shelter, or facility that is semi-secure;

a minor under protective custody may not be housed in a jail or other detention facility but may be housed in a semi-secure portion of an office, program, shelter, or other facility under (1)(C) of this subsection;

the peace officer, immediately upon taking a minor into protective custody, shall

advise the minor of available mediation services and of the right to social services under AS

47.10.142(b)

; and

if the identity of the minor’s parent or guardian is known, advise the minor’s parent or guardian that the minor has been taken into protective custody and that counseling services for the minor’s parent or guardian and the minor’s household may be available under AS

47.10.142(b)

.

A minor may be taken into emergency protective custody by a peace officer and placed into temporary detention in a juvenile detention facility in the local community if there has been an order issued by a court under (j) of this section. A minor detained under this subsection shall be brought before a court on the day the minor is detained, or if that is not possible, within 24 hours after the detention for a hearing to determine the most appropriate placement in the best interests of the minor. A minor taken into emergency protective custody under this subsection may not be detained for more than 24 hours, except as provided under (j) of this section. Emergency protective custody may not include placement of a minor in an adult correctional facility, an adult jail, or a temporary secure juvenile holding area, nor may an order for protective custody be enforced against a minor who is residing in a licensed program for runaway minors, as defined in AS

47.10.390

.

If, after investigation of a report of a missing minor, a law enforcement agency has reason to believe that the minor is involuntarily absent from the custody of a custodial parent or guardian, the department shall notify the Bureau of Vital Statistics of the disappearance and shall provide the bureau with a description of the minor. The description of the minor must include, if known, the minor’s full name, date and place of birth, parent’s names, and mother’s maiden name. If the Department of Public Safety has reason to believe that the minor, whether born in this state or not, has been enrolled in a specific school or school district in the state, the department shall also notify the last known school or school district attended in the state by the missing minor of the disappearance. When a person who was listed as a missing minor is found, the Department of Public Safety shall notify the Bureau of Vital Statistics and any school or school district previously informed of the person’s disappearance.

In the absence of gross negligence or intentional misconduct, an office, program, shelter, or facility, or an employee of an office, program, shelter, or facility, to which a minor is taken by a peace officer for semi-secure custody is not subject to civil or criminal liability based on the minor’s leaving the office, program, shelter, or facility without permission unless the office, program, shelter, or facility is not in compliance with the department’s regulations that set standards for semi-security and the lack of compliance was a material factor in the minor’s being able to leave without permission.

If a child, without permission, leaves the semi-secure portion of an office, program, shelter, or facility to which the child was taken by a peace officer under (b)(1)(C) of this section, the office, program, shelter, or facility shall immediately notify the department and the nearest law enforcement agency of the identity of the child and the child’s absence. If the same child is again taken into protective custody under (b) of this section and the peace officer knows that the child has previously been reported under this subsection as missing from a semi-secure placement, the peace officer, in addition to taking the appropriate action under (b) of this section, shall report the circumstances and the identity of the child to the department. Within 48 hours after receiving this report, the department shall determine whether to file a petition alleging that the child is a child in need of aid under AS

47.10.011

. If the department decides not to file a petition alleging that the child is a child in need of aid, the department shall, within seven state working days after receiving the report from the peace officer under this subsection, send to the child’s parents or guardian, as applicable, written notice of its determination not to proceed with the petition, including the reasons on which the determination was based. If the department is unable to obtain a reasonably reliable address for a parent or guardian, the department shall keep a copy of the notice on file and, notwithstanding AS

47.10.093

, release the notice to the child’s parent or guardian on request of the parent or guardian. If the department files a petition alleging that the child is a child in need of aid, the court shall proceed under AS

47.10.142(d)

.

If the department files a petition alleging the child is a child in need of aid under AS

47.10.011

(5) because the child is habitually absent from home or refuses available care, the child’s parent or guardian shall attend each hearing held during the child-in-need-of-aid proceedings unless the court excuses the parent or guardian from attendance for good cause. If the child is found to be a child in need of aid, the court may order that the

child participate in treatment;

parent or guardian personally participate in treatment reasonably available in the parent or guardian’s community as specified in a plan set out in the court order; and

child and the parent or guardian comply with other conditions set out in the court order.

If the court orders a minor’s parent or guardian to participate in the treatment under (g) of this section, the court may also order the parent or guardian to use available insurance or another resource to cover the treatment, or to pay for the treatment if other coverage is unavailable.

If the parent or guardian fails to attend a hearing as required by the court under (g) of this section, the hearing shall proceed without the presence of the parent.

The court shall issue a written order if the court determines that a minor shall be placed in a juvenile detention facility as a result of violating a court order issued under AS

47.10.080(c)(1)

or

47.10.142(f)

. An order issued under this subsection

must include a finding of probable cause that the minor is a runaway in wilful violation of a court order and identify the court order the minor has violated;

must specify the factual basis for determining that there is reasonable cause to believe that the minor has violated a court order;

must describe how the minor’s current situation poses a severe and imminent risk to the minor’s life or safety;

must include findings of fact to support a determination that there is not an appropriate, less restrictive alternative to placing the minor in a juvenile detention facility available, with due consideration to the best interests of the minor;

must include a plan for the minor’s release from the juvenile detention facility in the least amount of time necessary, not to exceed seven days unless otherwise specified by the court; and

may not be renewed or extended.

In this section,

“law enforcement agency” has the meaning given in AS

12.36.090

;

“semi-secure” means operated according to standards that may be established by the department in regulations that are designed to require a level of security that will reasonably ensure that, if a minor leaves without permission, the minor’s act of leaving will be immediately noticed;

“temporary secure juvenile holding area” has the meaning given in AS

47.12.990

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 42 SLA 1985; am § 3 ch 72 SLA 1988; am §§ 1, 2 ch 144 SLA 1988; am § 4 ch 202 SLA 1990; am § 13 ch 33 SLA 1994; am §§ 39, 40 ch 59 SLA 1996; am §§ 3 — 6 ch 120 SLA 1996; am § 1 ch 8 SLA 1997; am §§ 37, 38 ch 99 SLA 1998; am § 20 ch 57 SLA 2005; am §§ 15 — 17 ch 16 SLA 2021)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1996, subsection (b) was rewritten to reconcile amendments made by § 39, ch. 59, SLA 1996 and § 3, ch. 120, SLA 1996. Subsections (e)-(i) were enacted as (f)-(j), respectively, and relettered in 1996, at which time former (e) was relettered as (j) and internal references in subsections (f), (h), and (i) were conformed.

Subsection (j) was enacted as (k). Relettered in 2021, at which time former subsection (j) was relettered as subsection (k).

Cross references. —

For records of missing children, see AS

18.50.315

.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2005 amendment, effective July 2, 2005, updated a section reference in item (b)(1)(C)(iii).

The 2021 amendment, effective July 9, 2021, in (c), in the first sentence substituted “juvenile detention facility” for “juvenile detention home” and “(k) [now (j)] of this section” for “a finding of probable cause that (1) the minor is a runaway in willful violation of a valid court order issued under AS

47.10.080(c)(1)

,

47.10.142(f)

, AS

47.12.120(b)(1)

or (3), or

47.12.250(d)

, (2) the minor’s current situation poses a severe and imminent risk to the minor’s life or safety, and (3) no reasonable placement alternative exists within the community”, in the third sentence substituted “(k) [now (j)] of this section” for “AS

47.12.250

” at the end, in the fourth sentence, substituted “an adult correctional facility, an adult jail, or a temporary secure juvenile holding area” for “a jail or a secure facility other than a juvenile detention home”; added (j)(3); added (k) [now (j)].

Sec. 47.10.142.
Emergency custody and temporary placement hearing.

The Department of Health and Social Services may take emergency custody of a child upon discovering any of the following circumstances:

the child has been abandoned as abandonment is described in AS

47.10.013

;

the child has been neglected by the child’s parents or guardian, as “neglect” is described in AS

47.10.014

, and the department determines that immediate removal from the child’s surroundings is necessary to protect the child’s life or provide immediate necessary medical attention;

the child has been subjected to physical harm by a person responsible for the child’s welfare, and the department determines that immediate removal from the child’s surroundings is necessary to protect the child’s life or that immediate medical attention is necessary; or

the child or a sibling has been sexually abused under circumstances listed in AS

47.10.011

(7).

The department shall offer available counseling services to the person having legal custody of a minor described in AS

47.10.141

and to the members of the minor’s household if it determines that counseling services would be appropriate in the situation. If, after assessing the situation, offering available counseling services to the legal custodian and the minor’s household, and furnishing appropriate social services to the minor, the department considers it necessary, the department may take emergency custody of the minor.

When a child is taken into custody under (a) or (b) of this section or when the department is notified of a child’s presence in either a program for runaway children under AS

47.10.300

—

47.10.390

or a shelter for runaway children under AS

47.10.392

—

47.10.399

, the department shall immediately, and in no event more than 24 hours later unless prevented by lack of communication facilities, notify the parents or the person or persons having custody of the child. If the department determines that continued custody is necessary to protect the child, the department shall notify the court of the emergency custody by filing, within 24 hours after custody was assumed, a petition alleging that the child is a child in need of aid. If the department releases the child within 24 hours after taking the child into custody and does not file a child in need of aid petition, the department shall, within 24 hours after releasing the child, file with the court a report explaining why the child was taken into custody, why the child was released, and to whom the child was released.

The court shall immediately, and in no event more than 48 hours after being notified unless prevented by lack of transportation, hold a temporary custody hearing at which the child, if the child’s health permits, and the child’s parents or guardian, if they can be found, shall be permitted to be present. If present at the hearing, a parent or guardian of the child may request a continuance of the hearing for the purpose of preparing a response to the allegation that the child is a child in need of aid. The court may grant the request on a showing of good cause for why the parent or guardian is not prepared to respond to the allegation. During a continuance, the child remains in the temporary legal custody of the department, except as otherwise provided in this subsection. At the first hearing under this subsection, regardless of whether a continuance is granted, the court shall make a preliminary determination of whether continued placement in the home of the child’s parent or guardian would be contrary to the welfare of the child. If a court determines that continued placement in the home of the child’s parent or guardian would not be contrary to the welfare of the child, the court shall return the authority to place the child to the child’s parent or guardian pending a temporary custody hearing under (e) of this section.

When the temporary custody hearing is held, the court shall determine whether probable cause exists for believing the child to be a child in need of aid, as defined in AS

47.10.990

. If the court finds that probable cause exists, it shall order the child committed to the department for temporary placement, or order the child returned to the custody of the child’s parents or guardian, subject to the department’s supervision of the child’s care and treatment. The court shall inform the child, and the child’s parents or guardian if they can be found, of the reasons for finding probable cause, authorizing the child’s temporary placement, and, if applicable, finding that continued placement in the home of the child’s parents or guardian would be contrary to the welfare of the child. If the court finds no probable cause, it shall order the child returned to the custody of the child’s parents or guardian.

When a minor is committed to the department for temporary placement under (e) of this section, the court order shall specify the terms, conditions, and duration of placement. If the court orders the minor returned to the custody of the minor’s parents or guardian under (e) of this section after a hearing held on a petition filed under AS

47.10.141(f)

, the court shall specify the terms and conditions that must be followed by the minor and the minor’s parents or guardian. The court shall require the minor to remain in the placement provided by the department and shall clearly state in the order the consequences of violating the order, including detention under AS

47.10.141(c)

.

[Repealed, § 74 ch 35 SLA 2003.]

Within 12 months after a child is committed to the department under this section, the court shall review the placement plan and actual placement of the child under AS

47.10.080(l)

.

When the department takes emergency custody of a child under this section or a court orders a child committed to the department for temporary placement under this section, the department shall, to the extent feasible and consistent with the best interests of the child, place the child according to the criteria specified under AS

47.14.100(e)

. A supervisor at the department shall certify in writing in the case file whether the department has searched for an appropriate placement with an adult family member or family friend. If the department has not complied with the search requirements under this subsection, the supervisor shall work to ensure that the department completes the search in the shortest time feasible if it is consistent with the best interests of the child.

History.

(§ 3 ch 100 SLA 1971; am § 6 ch 104 SLA 1971; am § 24 ch 63 SLA 1977; am § 2 ch 104 SLA 1982; am §§ 6, 7 ch 39 SLA 1985; am § 3 ch 144 SLA 1988; am § 6 ch 117 SLA 1990; am §§ 14, 15 ch 33 SLA 1994; am §§ 41, 42 ch 59 SLA 1996; am § 7 ch 120 SLA 1996; am § 5 ch 94 SLA 1997; am §§ 39 — 41 ch 99 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 45 SLA 2000; am § 74 ch 35 SLA 2003; am §§ 1, 2 ch 117 SLA 2004; am § 8 ch 7 4SSLA 2016; am § 13 ch 15 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

In 1996, in subsection (f), “AS

47.10.141(f)

” was substituted for “AS

47.10.141(g)

” to reflect the 1996 relettering of AS

47.10.141(g)

.

Cross references. —

For court rules governing emergency custody and temporary custody hearings, see CINA Rules 6 and 10.

For the effect of the 2000 amendment of (d) of this section on Alaska Child in Need of Aid Rules, see sec. 4, ch. 45, SLA 2000 in the 2000 Temporary and Special Acts.

For provision relating to applicability of the 2018 amendment to subsection (i), see sec. 22(a), ch. 15, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For administration, see 7 AAC 50, art. 2.

For administration, see 7 AAC 56, art. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2003 amendment, effective June 3, 2003, repealed subsection (g).

The 2004 amendment, effective June 30, 2004, rewrote subsections (d) and (e), relating to temporary custody and placement hearings.

The 2016 amendment, effective October 24, 2016, added (i).

The 2018 amendment, effective September 5, 2018, in (i) added the last two sentences.

Editor's notes. —

Section 79(b), ch. 99, SLA 1998 provides that the 1998 amendments to subsections (a), (c), and (h) apply to “(1) a case or proceeding that is filed with the court on or after September 14, 1998;

“(2) an action taken under AS 47.10, AS 47.12, AS 47.17, or AS 47.35 on or after September 14, 1998; and

“(3) a motion that is filed with the court on or after September 14, 1998 in a case or proceeding that was pending in the court before September 14, 1998.”

Subsection (c) of § 79, ch. 99, SLA 1998 provides as follows: “The provisions of (b) of this section do not preclude consideration of evidence of conduct or omission of a person that brings a child under the jurisdiction of AS 47.10 or AS 47.12.”

Section 5, ch. 45, SLA 2000 provides that the 2000 amendment to subsection (d) applies to “circumstances in which emergency custody of a child is taken by the state on or after August 9, 2000.”

Section 3, ch. 117, SLA 2004, provides that the 2004 amendment of (d) and (e) of this section applies “to emergency custody and temporary placement hearings under [this chapter] conducted on or after June 30, 2004.”

AS 47.35 was repealed in 2005.

Secs. 47.10.150 — 47.10.180.
General power, duty, and authority of the department. [Repealed, § 55 ch 59 SLA 1996. For current law, see AS 47.14.010 — 47.14.050.]

Sec. 47.10.190.
Detention of minors. [Repealed, § 55 ch 59 SLA 1996. For current law, see AS 47.12.240(a).]

Sec. 47.10.200.
Releasing juveniles after commitment. [Repealed, § 55 ch 59 SLA 1996. For current law, see AS 47.12.260.]

Sec. 47.10.210.
Youth counsellors. [Repealed, § 55 ch 59 SLA 1996. For current law, see AS 47.12.270.]

Sec. 47.10.220.
Grants-in-aid. [Repealed, § 55 ch 59 SLA 1996. For current law, see AS 47.10.980 and 47.12.980.]

Secs. 47.10.230 — 47.10.260.
Care of children. [Repealed, § 55 ch 59 SLA 1996. For current law, see AS 47.14.100 — 47.14.130.]

Sec. 47.10.265.
Youth courts. [Repealed, § 55 ch 59 SLA 1996. For current law, see AS 47.12.400.]

Sec. 47.10.270.
[Renumbered as AS 47.10.970.]

Sec. 47.10.280.
Purpose of chapter. [Repealed, § 1 ch 152 SLA 1976.
For current similar provisions, see AS 47.05.060.]

Sec. 47.10.290.
[Renumbered as AS 47.10.990.]